Connecticut, session 2026, HB05556.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioners of
2 Children and Families, Developmental Services, Education, Social
3 Services and Mental Health and Addiction Services shall design and
4 implement a system to close service gaps for young persons ages
5 seventeen to twenty-two, inclusive, with intellectual or developmental
6 disabilities, including, but not limited to, autism spectrum disorder,
7 who (1) have co-occurring behavioral health needs, (2) are in urgent
8 need of community placement or state agency services, and (3) may
9 qualify for support from more than one state agency.
10 (b) The system designed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section
11 shall include, but need not be limited to:
12 (1) Memoranda of understanding signed by each commissioner
13 concerning identification of such young persons who may be eligible for
14 services administered by each state agency;
15 (2) Calculation of any additional resources needed by each state
sHB5556 / File No. 440 1

sHB5556 File No. 440
16 agency to provide services for such young persons;
17 (3) An inventory of residential behavioral health options for such
18 young persons who receive special education services but are not in the
19 custody of the Commissioner of Children and Families; and
20 (4) Psychiatric residential treatment options, including, but not
21 limited to, (A) a request for proposals by the Commissioner of Social
22 Services for a facility of not more than ten beds that may be eligible for
23 federal Medicaid reimbursement, and (B) an inventory of available state
24 property that may be suitable for such a facility.
25 (c) Not later than October 1, 2026, the commissioners shall file a joint
26 report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
27 statutes, with the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
28 having cognizance of matters relating to appropriations and the budgets
29 of state agencies, children, education, human services and public health
30 and the Transforming Children's Behavioral Health Policy and Planning
31 Committee established pursuant to section 2-137 of the general statutes.
32 The report shall include, but need not be limited to, (1) any state
33 appropriations needed to implement the provisions of this section, (2)
34 an update on progress made by each state agency to close service gaps
35 for such young persons, and (3) recommendations for ways to close such
36 gaps in the future.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
"(NEW)" was inserted, references to "young adults" were changed to
"young persons" and "agency" was changed to "state agency"
throughout for accuracy and consistency.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5556 / File No. 440 2

sHB5556 File No. 440
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Departments of Children and Families,
Developmental Services, Education, Social Services, and Mental Health
and Addiction Services to design and implement a system to close
service gaps for certain youth with intellectual or developmental
disabilities, resulting in no fiscal impact. The agencies have the
necessary expertise to meet the requirements of the bill.
sHB5556 / File No. 440 3

sHB5556 File No. 440
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5556
AN ACT CONCERNING COMPLEX CARE SERVICE DELIVERY FOR
YOUNG PERSONS WITH CO-OCCURRING MENTAL HEALTH AND
INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY OR AUTISM DIAGNOSES.